Massachusetts, session 194th, H1274.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
An Act prohibiting PBMs from discriminating against hospitals and patients participating
in the 340B drug discount program.
(a) In this section “340B covered entity” means an entity participating in the federal 340B
drug discount program, as described in 42 U.S.C. § 256b, including its pharmacy or pharmacies,
or any pharmacy or pharmacies, contracted with the participating entity to dispense drugs
purchased through such program. (b) A pharmacy benefit manager or other third party that
reimburses a 340B covered entity for drugs shall not:
(1) reimburse the 340B covered entity for a drug at a rate lower than that paid for the
same drug to entities that are not 340B covered entities; (2) assess any fee, charge-back, or other
adjustment on the 340B covered entity on the basis that the covered entity participates in the
340B program; (3) restrict participation in a pharmacy or provider network based on an entity’s
of 2

status as a 340B covered entity; (4) require the 340B covered entity to enter into a contract with a
specific pharmacy to participate in the pharmacy benefit manager or third party’s pharmacy or
provider network; (5) require a claim for a drug to include a modifier, supplemental
transmission, to indicate that the drug is a 340B drug, or any other method of identifying the
claim for a 340B drug, unless the claim is for payment, directly or indirectly, by Medicaid; or (6)
impose coverage or benefits limitations, or require an enrollee to pay an additional fee, higher
copay, higher coinsurance, second copay, second coinsurance, or other penalty when obtaining a
drug from a 340 covered entity; (7) interfere with the patient's right to choose to obtain a drug
from a 340B covered entity, including inducement, steering, or offering financial or other
incentives.
of 2